Maryland, session 2026, HB0669.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
8–646.
(a) Except as permitted by this section or in accordance with a permit obtained
from the Administration, a person may not:
(1) Make an opening in any State highway;
(2) Place any structure on any State highway;
(3) Change or renew any structure placed on any State highway;
(4) Dig up any State highway for any purpose, including the placement of
pipes, sewers, poles, wires, or rails;
(5) Plant or remove any tree on any State highway; or
(6) Place any obstruction or improvement on any State highway.
(b) (1) The Administration may issue a permit for work otherwise prohibited
by subsection (a) of this section.
(2) Work done under the permit shall be performed to the satisfaction of
the Administration and under its supervision.
(3) If the work done under the permit will be performed within 1 mile of
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority rail or bus rapid transit stations or
Maryland Transit Administration rail or bus rapid transit stations, including Maryland
Area Regional Commuter (MARC) stations, the person to whom the permit is issued or by
whom the work is done shall maintain a safe alternative pedestrian path at the work site
in accordance with regulations adopted under this section.
(4) The person to whom the permit is issued or by whom the work is done
shall pay the cost of replacing the highway in as good a condition as before the work was
done.
(5) (i) The Administration shall require a nongovernment applicant for
a permit issued under this subsection who is a developer to submit a performance bond,
letter of credit, or other surety acceptable to the Administration.

HOUSE BILL 669 3
(ii) The Administration shall require a nongovernment applicant for
a permit issued under this subsection to submit a payment bond, letter of credit, or other
surety acceptable to the Administration if:
1. The amount of the improvement is estimated to exceed
$100,000;
2. The project is financed, in whole or in part, by private
funds; and
3. The entire improvement is located outside the applicant’s
property.
(6) A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION MAY NOT ISSUE A USE AND OCCUPANCY
PERMIT TO A NONGOVERNMENT HOLDER OF A PERMIT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
SECTION WHO IS REQUIRED TO COMPLETE WORK OTHERWISE PROHIBITED BY
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION ON A STATE HIGHWAY THAT CARRIES AN
AVERAGE TRAFFIC VOLUME OF MORE THAN 25,000 VEHICLES A DAY UNTIL THE
WORK IS COMPLETED TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE ADMINISTRATION AND THE
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION.
(6) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY REQUIRE A
NONGOVERNMENTAL APPLICANT FOR A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
TO SUBMIT, IN A MANNER THAT THE ADMINISTRATION REQUIRES, A SCHEDULE FOR
THE WORK TO BE PERFORMED UNDER THE PERMIT.
(II) A PERSON ISSUED A PERMIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION WHO
IS REQUIRED TO SUBMIT A SCHEDULE TO THE ADMINISTRATION UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. SHALL COMPLETE ALL WORK IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE SCHEDULE OR ANY EXTENSION THE ADMINISTRATION APPROVES; AND
2. IF THE PERSON FAILS TO COMPLETE THE WORK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE SCHEDULE OR ANY EXTENSION THE ADMINISTRATION
APPROVES, IS:
A. SUBJECT TO REVOCATION OF THE PERMIT; AND
B. LIABLE, WITH ITS SURETIES, FOR ALL DAMAGES
SUSTAINED BY THE STATE AS A RESULT OF THE FAILURE, INCLUDING ANY COSTS
INCURRED BY THE ADMINISTRATION TO COMPLETE THE WORK.

HOUSE BILL 669
(III) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE
TO A PERSON WHOSE PERMIT IS REVOKED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.